Vermont, session 2025-2026, H337.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 4 is amended to read:
§ 4. DUTIES AS TO EMPLOYMENT AND PAYMENT OF WAGES
(a) The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s agent shall make
examinations and investigations to see that the laws pertaining to the
VT LEG #379383 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.337
2025 Page 2 of 2
employment of minors and the weekly payment of wages are being complied
with and for such purposes may enter any place where persons are employed.
(b) The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s agent shall publish
information on the enforcement actions taken by the Department of Labor’s
Wage and Hour Program concerning minimum wage, overtime, prevailing
wage, and child labor. The information shall be published in a searchable
format on a publicly accessible website. The identity of complainants shall be
excluded, as well as information that is more than six years old.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379383 v.1